Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,108
Insolvent or insolvency, defined.

Insolvent or insolvency shall mean that the health maintenance organization has been declared insolvent and placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 17.